Vermont statutes. Title 2 Legislature
Subchapter 1. Joint Fiscal Committee

§ 501.
Creation of Committee; purpose.

There is created a Joint Fiscal Committee whose membership shall be appointed on or before January 15 of each biennial session of the General Assembly. The Committee shall consist of five Representatives and five Senators as follows:

the Chair of the House Committee on Appropriations;

the Chair of the House Committee on Ways and Means;

the Chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations;

the Chair of the Senate Committee on Finance;

two members of the House, not both from the same political party, appointed by the Speaker of the House;

two members of the Senate, not both from the same political party, appointed by the Committee on Committees; and

one member of the Senate to be appointed by the Committee on Committees and one member of the House to be appointed by the Speaker.

The Joint Fiscal Committee shall meet immediately following the appointment of its membership to organize and conduct its business. The Committee shall elect a chair, vice chair, and clerk and shall adopt rules of procedure. The Committee may meet at any time at the call of the Chair or a majority of the members of the Committee. A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.

For attendance at a meeting when the General Assembly is not in session, members of the Joint Fiscal Committee shall be entitled to the same per diem compensation and reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses as provided members of standing committees under section 23 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 24, 1974; amended

1977, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 202;

1983, No. 88

, § 12, eff. July 3, 1983;

1997, No. 61

, § 273;

2019, No. 72

, § E.127, eff. June 18, 2019;

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 502.
Repealed. 2019 No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 503.
Functions.

The Joint Fiscal Committee shall:

hire the Chief Fiscal Officer;

carry on a continuing review of the fiscal operations of the State, including revenues, budgeting, and expenditures;

accept grants and approve any related limited service positions, gifts, loans, or any other thing of value, approved by the Governor, under the provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 5

;

establish prioritization for the work of the Joint Fiscal Office; and

keep minutes of its meetings and maintain a file thereof.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 24, 1974; amended

1977, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 187, eff. April 17, 1978;

1997, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2019, No. 72

, § E.127.1;

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 504.
Repealed. 2019 No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 505.
Redesignated. 2019 No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 11(c).